District of Columbia statutes.
5-115.02

Duty to make known; return notice.

Every case of arrest shall be made known within 6 hours thereafter to the lieutenant of police on duty in the precinct in which the arrest is made, by the person making the same; and it shall be the duty of the lieutenant within 12 hours after such notice, to make written return thereof, according to the rules and regulations of the Council of the District of Columbia, together with the name of the party arrested, the offense, the place of arrest, and the place of detention.

R.S., D.C., § 399
June 11, 1878, 20 Stat. 107, ch. 180, § 6
This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 402(100) of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to the District of Columbia Council, subject to the right of the Commissioner as provided in § 406 of the Plan. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.
1973 Ed., § 4-142.
1981 Ed., § 4-141.